Louisiana, session 2026, HB618.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:104(A)(17)(d), (C), and (D) and 104.1(B)(1) and (2), (D), and (E)
are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 36:104(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§104. Powers and duties of the secretary of economic development
A. In addition to the functions, powers, and duties otherwise vested in the
secretary by law, the secretary shall:
* * *
(17)(a)
* * *
(d) Any lease, sublease, or sale of property listed in this Paragraph has to first
be approved by the commissioner of administration, with reporting of the transaction
submitted to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget annually. After the lease,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 618 ENROLLED
sublease, or sale of property has been initiated, the Joint Legislative Committee on
the Budget shall have oversight on the purchase process.
* * *
C. The amount of fees and costs shall not exceed the following:
(1) The fee for an advance notification shall not exceed two hundred fifty
three hundred fifty dollars.
(2) The fee for filing an application shall be equal to one-half of one percent
of the amount of the incentives or exempted taxes. However, the minimum amount
shall be five hundred six hundred fifty dollars and the maximum amount of the fee
shall be fifteen thousand twenty thousand dollars.
(3) The fee for a loan guaranty shall not exceed four five and one-half
percent of the guaranteed loan amount.
(4) The fee for an affidavit of final cost or project completion report,
regardless of whether it is the original report or an amended report, shall not exceed
two hundred fifty three hundred fifty dollars.
(5) The fee for an annual certification report, including but not limited to
compliance reports, employee reports, and payroll reports, shall not exceed two
hundred fifty three hundred fifty dollars.
(6) The fee for a contract amendment, including but not limited to a transfer
or name change, shall not exceed two hundred fifty three hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The fee for a contract renewal shall not exceed two hundred fifty six
hundred fifty dollars.
(8) The fee for a statutorily required verification report, including but not
limited to an expenditure verification by a certified public accountant or tax attorney,
audits, attestations, tax opinions, or other reports under agreed-upon procedures shall
not exceed the actual cost to the department based on hours expended at a rate not
to exceed two hundred fifty three hundred fifty dollars an per hour for
department-contracted services or salary and benefits for department employee
services.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 618 ENROLLED
(9) The fee for any miscellaneous, unique administrative document,
including but not limited to special requests and revised or reissued certification or
rebate letters, shall not exceed three hundred fifty dollars.
D. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the secretary may
exercise discretion in the collection of fees and may authorize a reduction of or
waive fees for small businesses if fees present a financial hardship and are
disproportionate to benefits received and the reduction or waiver is determined to be
in the best interest of the state.
D. E. Fees collected pursuant to Subsection C of the this Section shall be
used solely for costs associated with the administration of department programs.
§104.1. Fee for independent certified public accountant or tax attorney verification
reports required for certain Louisiana Economic Development programs
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, the term "certified public accountant", or
"CPA", shall mean means a person who meets all of the following qualifications:
(1) Maintains an active unrestricted original certified public account
accountant license and is in good standing.
(2) Maintains a current Louisiana certified public account accountant firm
permit.
* * *
D. The applicant seeking certification of tax credits a statutorily required
verification report shall be responsible for and assessed an expenditure or expense
verification report fee which shall be equal to the actual cost of the verification
report. The fee shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars and shall be based upon
either an hourly rate not to exceed two hundred twenty-five three hundred
twenty-five dollars per hour for contract services, or the pro rata cost of salary and
benefits for a department-employed CPA.
E. The applicant seeking certification of tax credits shall be required to
submit an up-front deposit of the expenditure or expense verification report fee,
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 618 ENROLLED
which shall not exceed fifteen thousand twenty thousand dollars, as required by the
relative applicable program statute or rules.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.